New York, session 2025-2026, S6057.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 2 155 to read as follows: 3 § 155. Access to post-traumatic stress disorder treatment for 4 correction officers and emergency dispatchers. 1. Correction officers 5 and emergency dispatchers employed by a municipality shall be entitled 6 to the same benefits and services for the diagnosis and treatment of 7 post-traumatic stress disorder as are afforded police officers and fire- 8 fighters employed by such municipality, and such benefits and services 9 shall be accessed through the same policies and procedures. 10 2. Any collective bargaining agreement or employment contract entered 11 into by a municipality and an employee or an employee organization 12 representing emergency dispatchers or correction officers employed by 13 such municipality shall provide the same benefits and services for the 14 diagnosis and treatment of post-traumatic stress disorder as provided to 15 police officers and firefighters employed by such municipality, which 16 shall be accessed through the same policies and procedures, provided, 17 however, that nothing contained in this section shall prohibit an 18 employee organization representing emergency dispatchers and correction 19 officers employed by a municipality from seeking to provide greater 20 benefits and services for the diagnosis and treatment of post-traumatic 21 stress disorder than those provided to police officers and firefighters 22 employed by such municipality. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06659-01-5